hfst/verb-som-lex.txt
LEXICON V3B
gado:ga{d}{o}		V3B_VerbMorf 		"(soo): buy"                      ;
sarifo:sarif{o}		V3B_VerbMorf 		"exchange money"                  ;
wado:wa{d}{o}		V3B_VerbMorf 		"drive" ; 								 
yeelo:yeel{o}		V3B_VerbMorf 		"have, hold"                      ;
dhufo:dhuf{o}		V3B_VerbMorf 		"(ku): hit with"	;
furo:fur{o}			V3B_VerbMorf 		"open for oneself"			;
gado:ga{d}{o}		V3B_VerbMorf 		"buy"			;

! TODO: Check whether these change or not.
waalo:waal{o}			V3B_VerbMorf 		"go mad (intr.)"                  ;
booqo:booq{o}			V3B_VerbMorf		"visit"							  ;
fadhiiso:fadhiis{o}		V3B_VerbMorf 		"sit down; (soo): sit down"		;
seexo:seex{o}			V3B_VerbMorf 		"sleep"                           ;			
seexseexo:seexseex{o}	V3B_VerbMorf 		"sleep (of a number of people)"   ;	


! These do not change the final -o to -a
! TODO: this is not blocking o/a alternation. msut fix.
LEXICON V3B_2
soco:soco		V3B_VerbMorf		"proceed, continue; (u): on" ;


! These are extra special
LEXICON V3B_3
cadhow:cadhaa 		V3B_VerbMorf 	"get angry, u - with" ;		! cadhaaday, cadhaatay
dhimo:dhinta		V3B_VerbMorf 		"die" ; 						! / dhintaa



LEXICON Unknown
soc   		VerbMorf 		"walk" ;
rab   		VerbMorf 		"want" ;
cun:cum   	VerbMorf 		"eat" ;

! Some data from orwin, also in misc.words, copying here.

! V 3A		guurso		"get married"
! V 3A		qabso		"take hold"
! V 3B		gubo		"burn (intr.)"
! V 3B		guduudo		"become reddish brown"
! V 3B		guuleyso	"ku: succeed in"
! V 3B		hayso		"have"
! V 3B		iibso		"(soo): buy; sii: sell"
! V 3B		isbahayso	"to make an alliance"
! V 3B		jeclayso	"like"
! V 3B		leexo		"u: turn to"
! V 3B		noqo		"ku soo: return to"
! V 3B		oggolow		"allow, approve, ratify" ! oggolaaday, oggolaatay
! V 3B		qaado		"get, take; ka: from"
! V 3B		qaado		"take for oneself" ! qaatay
! V 3B		qabo		"catch, hold"
! V 3B		quraaco		"have breakfast"

! V 2B		caddee		"whiten, make clear, explain"
! V 2B		cashee		"have dinner, evening meal"
! V 2B		cawee		"spend hte evening"
! V 2B		daadguree	"ka soo: evacuate"
! V 2B		dambee		"come after"
! V 2B		dhammee		"finish"
! V 2B		dhexee		"be in between"
! V 3			dhegeyso	"listen"
! V 3			dhowow		"move nearer; (soo): come in"
! V 3A		buuxso		"fill for oneself"
! V 3B		booqo		"visit"
! V 3B		cadhow		"get angry, u - with" ! cadhaaday, cadhaatay
! V 3B		dhimo		"die" / dhintaa
! V 3B		dhufo		"(ku): hit with"
! V 3B		fadhiiso	"sit down; (soo): sit down"
! V 3B		furo		"open for oneself"
! V 3B		gado		"buy"
! V ?			dhaqaaq		"ku: announce"
